Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3923
Commission on Public Advocacy; created; duties.

The Commission on Public Advocacy is created. The commission shall provide legal services and resources to assist counties in fulfilling their obligation to provide for effective assistance of counsel for indigent persons.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 5.

Civil legal services for eligible low-income persons, see sections 25-3001 to 25-3004.